Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB120.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of February 13, 1970 (P.L.19, No.10), entitled "An act enabling certain minors to consent to medical, dental and health services, declaring consent unnecessary under certain circumstances," is amended by adding a section to read:Section 6. Consent Required for Vaccines.--(a) An individual who is eighteen years of age or older, or has graduated from high school, or has been pregnant or is legally emancipated may consent to receive a vaccine for himself or herself, and the consent of no other person shall be necessary.(b) An individual under eighteen years of age, or who has not graduated from high school, or who has not been pregnant or who has not been legally emancipated may not solely give consent 12345678910111213141516171819 to receive a vaccine. Consent from a parent or legal guardian shall be required prior to the administration of a vaccine for an individual specified under this subsection. An individual specified under this subsection or another parent or legal guardian may not abrogate the consent provided by a parent or legal guardian under this subsection on the individual's behalf.Section 2. The General Assembly finds and declares that the addition of section 6 of the act relates to a subject matter that is of Statewide concern. The addition of section 6 of the act shall supersede and preempt a local ordinance, rule, regulation, code, resolution, practice or other action of a municipality, including a home rule municipality, political subdivision or local government entity that regulates a matter relating to vaccine administration for an individual specified under the addition of section 6 of the act. A local ordinance, rule, regulation, code, resolution, practice or other action of a municipality, including a home rule municipality, political subdivision or local government entity that regulates a matter relating to vaccine administration for an individual specified under the addition of section 6 of the act is declared null and void.Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0120PN0102 - 2 - 12345678910111213141516171819202122